languages/apertium-nog/tests/cases.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../nog.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../nog.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "[twol] Cases for solidly front-vowel word":
    киси<n><nom> : киси
    киси<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : кисилери
    киси<n><gen> : кисидинъ
    киси<n><dat> : кисиге

  "[twol] Cases for solidly back-vowel words":
    халк<n><nom> : халк
    халк<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : халклары
    халк<n><gen> : халктынъ
    халк<n><dat> : халкка
    авыл<n><nom> : авыл
    авыл<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : авыллары
    авыл<n><gen> : авылдынъ
    авыл<n><dat> : авылга


  "[twol] Cases for potentially confusing words":
    аьдем<n><nom> : аьдем
    аьдем<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : аьдемлери
    аьдем<n><gen> : аьдемнинъ
    аьдем<n><dat> : аьдемге
    уьй<n><nom> : уьй
    уьй<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : уьйлери
    уьй<n><gen> : уьйдинъ
    уьй<n><dat> : уьйге

  "[twol] Cases for orthographic exceptions":
    юз<n><nom> : юз
    юз<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : юзлери
    юз<n><gen> : юздинъ
    юз<n><dat> : юзге
    китап<n><nom> : китап
    китап<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : китаплери
    китап<n><gen> : китаптинъ
    китап<n><dat> : китапке

  "Russian words ending in ь":
    автомобиль<n><nom> : автомобиль
    автомобиль<n><pl><nom> : автомобильдер
    автомобиль<n><gen> : автомобильдинъ
    автомобиль<n><px3sp><acc> : автомобилин
    руль<n><nom> : руль
    руль<n><pl><nom> : рульдер
    руль<n><gen> : рульдинъ
    руль<n><px3sp><acc> : рулин

  "[twol] Russian words ending in 'voiced' consonants":
    съезд<n><nom> : съезд
    съезд<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : съездлери
    съезд<n><gen> : съездтинъ
    съезд<n><dat> : съездке
 
